Utah statutes.
76-8-713.   Person not a student, officer or employee -- Re-entry of campus or facility after direction to leave.

If a person who is not a student, officer, or employee of an institution of higher education and is not required by his employment to be on the campus or other facility owned, operated, or controlled by an institution of higher education, enters the campus or facility, and it reasonably appears to the chief administrative officer of the campus or facility or his agent or representative that the person is committing an act likely to interfere with the peaceful conduct of the activities of the campus or facility or has entered the campus or facility for the purpose of committing any such act, the chief administrative officer or his agent or representative may direct the person to leave the campus or facility, and if he fails to do so or willfully and knowingly re-enters upon the campus or facility within 72 hours after being directed to leave, he is guilty of an offense and shall be punished as provided in Section 76-8-717.

